Mississippi statutes. Title 89. Real and Personal Property
Chapter 13. Party Fences

§ 89-13-1.
Adjoining owners to contribute.

Persons owning adjoining land or lots, or being lessees thereof for more than two (2) years, shall be bound to contribute equally to the erection of fences on the line dividing the land or lots, if the land or lots on their respective sides be used by the owner or lessee thereof for purposes of cultivation, or for horticultural purposes, or for the purpose of pasturing cattle, horses, hogs or sheep, or if a lot be used as an inclosure for any other purpose; and each party shall be bound to contribute equally toward keeping the party fences in good repair so long as the land or lot be so used. An owner shall not be bound to contribute to the erection of a party fence, either built or to be built, or to keeping the same in repair, who may prefer to build a fence and to leave a lane on his land between himself and the adjoining owner. But the failure to erect such fence for the space of sixty (60) days shall be deemed an abandonment of the intention to do so, and a determination to adopt the fence built, and the person so failing shall then be bound to pay his proportion of the value of the party fence.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 12, art. 6 (4); 1857, ch. 16, art. 2; 1871, § 1908; 1880, § 971; 1892, § 3126; 1906, § 3549; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2866; 1930, § 5676; 1942, § 989.

§ 89-13-3.
Enforcement of contribution.

If any person, being requested to do so, will not contribute his proper share of the work and furnish the requisite materials suitable for a party fence, or pay the value of his share, the person desiring to build the fence may erect or construct the whole of it, of a proper and suitable kind, being a lawful fence, and may thereafter apply, in writing, to a justice of the peace, who shall appoint three (3) impartial freeholders of the neighborhood to view the fence and determine what amount should be paid by the person who has failed to contribute.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 12, art. 6 (4); 1857, ch. 16, art. 3; 1871, § 1909; 1880, § 972; 1892, § 3127; 1906, § 3550; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2867; 1930, § 5677; 1942, § 990.

§ 89-13-5.
Enforcement of contribution; notice and proceedings.

The opposite party shall have five (5) days’ notice of the time of the meeting of the freeholders, which may be served as a summons is required to be, and each party may introduce evidence of the value of the fence; and the freeholders, or a majority of them, may assess the amount to be paid by the one party to the other, and shall give to the party entitled to the compensation a certificate stating the amount they assess in his favor.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 12, art. 6 (4); 1857, ch. 16, art. 3; 1871, § 1909; 1880, § 972; 1892, § 3128; 1906, § 3551; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2868; 1930, § 5678; 1942, § 991.

§ 89-13-7.
Enforcement of contribution; action for amount assessed.

The party may maintain an action for the amount assessed by the freeholders; and the order of the justice appointing the freeholders, and the certificate of the freeholders, and proof of notice to the opposite party of the time of the meeting, shall be prima facie evidence to support the action. The amount recovered shall be a lien upon the land or lot of the defendant.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 16, art. 3; 1871, § 1909; 1880, § 972; 1892, § 3129; 1906, § 3552; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2869; 1930, § 5679; 1942, § 992.

§ 89-13-9.
Enforcement of contribution; costs.

The freeholders each shall receive One Dollar and Fifty Cents ($1.50) per day whilst discharging their duty, to be paid by the party at whose instance they were appointed, who may recover the amount as costs, and the justice shall be entitled to fees as in other cases.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 16, art. 3; 1871, § 1909; 1880, § 972; 1892, § 3130; 1906, § 3553; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2870; 1930, § 5680; 1942, § 993.

§ 89-13-11.
Contribution where fence already built.

In case any party fence has been already built, and the adjoining land be used by the owner thereof for any of the purposes set forth in Section 89-17-1, the party who built the same shall in like manner be entitled to compensation, to the extent that ought to be contributed by the owner of the adjoining land, and in case of refusal to pay the same, the amount may be assessed and a recovery had in the same manner as for erecting a new fence.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 16, art. 4; 1871, § 1910; 1880, § 973; 1892, § 3131; 1906, § 3554; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2871; 1930, § 5681; 1942, § 994.

§ 89-13-13.
Contribution to keep fence in repair.

Each proprietor of land or lots separated by a party fence, shall be bound to contribute his due proportion of labor and materials for keeping the fence in good repair, so far as to make it a lawful fence; and contributions for that purpose may be enforced as above provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 16, art. 5; 1871, § 1911; 1880, § 974; 1892, § 3132; 1906, § 3555; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2872; 1930, § 5682; 1942, § 995.

§ 89-13-15.
Ownership of party fence; fence not to be removed.

A party fence will be owned jointly by the respective proprietors, either of whom may require the other to contribute to repairing it, but it shall not be taken away, razed, removed, or left down by either party without the consent of the other; and if either party violate this provision, he shall be liable to the action of the other, and be subject to such penalties as a stranger would be. However, a party shall not be bound to contribute towards keeping a party fence in repair, after he shall have ceased to use the land which is divided by it.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 16, art. 6; 1871, § 1912; 1880, § 975; 1892, § 3133; 1906, § 3556; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2873; 1930, § 5683; 1942, § 996.

§ 89-13-17.
Departure from line.

When, from natural obstacles, it shall be impracticable to erect the entire fence on the dividing line, and it be necessary to make a departure on either side, such departure may be made, but the fence shall, notwithstanding, be a party fence.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 16, art. 7; 1871, § 1913; 1880, § 976; 1892, § 3134; 1906, § 3557; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2874; 1930, § 5684; 1942, § 997.

§ 89-13-19.
Removal and abandonment of party fence.

In case a joint-owner of a party fence shall desire to have a lane on his land, between his own and the adjoining land, he shall be at liberty to remove his part of the fence, on giving six (6) months’ notice to the other joint-owner, and not otherwise; but any proprietor who may remove from his land, and cease to use it for any of the purposes before mentioned, shall thereby abandon his right to the party fence.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 16, art. 8; 1871, § 1914; 1880, § 977; 1892, § 3135; 1906, § 3558; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2875; 1930, § 5685; 1942, § 998.

§ 89-13-21.
Sale of land; lessee or owner to contribute.

In case of the sale of the premises to another person, the purchaser shall have the same right and incur the same liabilities as the original owner, in regard to the party fence. A lessee for a longer time than two (2) years shall stand in the attitude of a purchaser during his term; but if the lease be for two (2) years, or a shorter time, the owner shall be bound to contribute towards the erection and repair of the party fence, if either the owner or the tenant use the land; and in such case, the notice served on the tenant, if the owner be absent, will be sufficient.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 16, art. 8; 1871, § 1914; 1880, § 977; 1892, § 3136; 1906, § 3559; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2876; 1930, § 5686; 1942, § 999.

§ 89-13-23.
Fence removed if not paid for, and adopted by paying proportion of value.

The person who built the party fence may remove it at pleasure, if the owner of the adjoining land will not pay his proportion thereof; and although the proprietor of any land may desire to retain any fence built by him on a line which divides his land from that of another person, as a private fence, yet that other person may adopt the same as a party fence by paying his proportion of the value thereof; and if the value cannot be agreed upon by the parties, the person desiring to adopt the fence may apply to a justice of the peace to appoint freeholders to assess the proportion that should be paid, as in other cases.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 16, art. 9; 1871, § 1915; 1880, § 978; 1892, § 3137; 1906, § 3560; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2877; 1930, § 5687; 1942, § 1000.